inc/flattened/verb_suffixes_flattened_abstract.lexc
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>aaw%>%>ag%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>aaw%>%>egw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>aaw%>%>a%>%>d%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3ObvO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>aa%>%>waag%>%>w4eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1SgO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>i2%>%>g%>%>%>%>w4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2PlO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>inin%>%>egw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2SgO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>ik%>%>enh #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+ExclO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>i2%>%>w%>%>angi%>%>d%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+InclO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>inin%>%>angw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>aaw%>%>angi%>%>d%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>aaw%>%>angw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0/3Obv+3PlProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>igo%>%>waag%>%>o%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+1Sg+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>aaw%>%>agi%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Pl+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>aaw%>%>ego%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Sg+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>aaw%>%>a%>%>di%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+3ObvO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>aa%>%>waag%>%>w4b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+1SgO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>i2%>%>g%>%>%>%>o%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+2PlO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>inin%>%>ego%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+2SgO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>iki%>b1an2%>%>enh #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+ExclO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>i2%>%>w%>%>angi%>%>di%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+InclO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>inin%>%>ango%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Excl+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>aaw%>%>angi%>%>di%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Incl+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>aaw%>%>ango%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0/3Obv+3PlProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>igo%>%>waad1y1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>agw4 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>egw4 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>a%>%>d #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3ObvO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>aa%>%>waad1y1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1SgO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>i2%>%>d1%>%>y1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2PlO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>inin%>%>egw4 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2SgO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>ik #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+ExclO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>i2%>%>y%>%>angi%>%>d #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+InclO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>inin%>%>angw4 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>angi%>%>d #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>ang #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0/3Obv+3PlProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>igo%>%>waap%>an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>ago%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>ego%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>a%>%>di%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3ObvO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>aa%>%>waap%>an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1SgO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>i2%>%>p%>%>%>an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2PlO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>inin%>%>ego%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2SgO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>iki%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+ExclO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>i2%>%>y%>%>angi%>%>di%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+InclO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>inin%>%>ango%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>angi%>%>di%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@P.3Num.Pl@%>%>angi%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+X+1SgO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>%>w4%>aam%>b1aan2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+X+2PlO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>%>w4%>ego%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+X+2SgO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>%>w4%>am%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+X+ExclO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>%>w4%>aangi%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+X+InclO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>%>w4%>ango%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2PlO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>%>w4%>egw%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2SgO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>%>w4%>an%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+ExclO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>%>w4%>aang%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+InclO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>%>w4%>angw%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+1SgO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>igooc1%>aam%>b1aan2%>%>h #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+2PlO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>igooc1%>ego%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+2SgO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>igooc1%>am%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+ExclO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>igooc1%>aangi%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+InclO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>igooc1%>ango%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2PlO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@%>%>igooc1%>egw #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2SgO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@%>%>igooc1%>an #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+ExclO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@%>%>igooc1%>aang #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+InclO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@%>%>igooc1%>angw #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+1SgO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>igooc1%>aan%>%>h #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@P.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+1SgO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@D.Person@@P.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode@%>%>igooc1%>%>w4%>aan%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X+1SgO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>si%>%>w4%>aam%>b1aan2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X+2PlO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>si%>%>w4%>ego%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X+2SgO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>si%>%>w4%>am%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X+ExclO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>si%>%>w4%>aangi%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X+InclO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>si%>%>w4%>ango%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2PlO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>si%>%>w4%>egw%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2SgO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>si%>%>w4%>an%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+ExclO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>si%>%>w4%>aang%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+InclO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>si%>%>w4%>angw%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+1SgO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>igooc1%>siw%>aam%>b1aan2%>%>h #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2PlO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>igooc1%>siw%>ego%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2SgO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>igooc1%>siw%>am%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+ExclO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>igooc1%>siw%>aangi%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+InclO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>igooc1%>siw%>ango%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2PlO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@%>%>igooc1%>siw%>egw #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2SgO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@%>%>igooc1%>siw%>an #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+ExclO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@%>%>igooc1%>siw%>aang #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+InclO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@%>%>igooc1%>siw%>angw #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+1SgO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@D.Mode@@D.Mode.Dub@%>%>igooc1%>siw%>aan%>%>h #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@P.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+1SgO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person@@P.Mode.Dub@@R.Mode@%>%>igooc1%>si%>%>w4%>aan%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X+1SgO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>sii%>%>w4%>aam%>b1aan2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X+2PlO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>sii%>%>w4%>ego%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X+2SgO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>sii%>%>w4%>am%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X+ExclO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>sii%>%>w4%>aangi%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X+InclO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>sii%>%>w4%>ango%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2PlO:@D.Person@@P.Passive.1@@P.Negation.1@@P.Mode.Yes@@D.Person@%>%>igooc1%>sii%>%>w4%>egw%>en2 #;
